Utah statutes.
42-3-2.   Recording fee.
Any person having the name of the person’s farm so recorded shall first pay
to the commissioner of agriculture and food a fee determined by the
commissioner pursuant to Section 63J-1-504.  This fee shall be transmitted to
the General Fund.
